Utah statutes.
4-29-5.   License -- Application -- Fee -- Expiration -- Renewal.
Application to operate a hatchery or to engage in the business of selling
chicks, poults, or hatching eggs shall be made to the department upon forms
prescribed and furnished by it. Upon receipt of a proper application and
payment of a license fee in an amount determined by the department pursuant to
Subsection 4-2-2(2), the commissioner, if satisfied that the convenience and
necessity of the industry and the public will be served, shall issue a license
entitling the applicant to engage in the otherwise proscribed activity through
December 31 of the year in which the license is issued.  A hatchery license is
annually renewable on or before December 31 of each year upon the payment of
an annual license renewal fee in an amount determined by the department
pursuant to Subsection 4-2-2(2).
